Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.210

Right of person to rely on prayer to alleviate ailments not abridged.

Nothing in chapter 43.20 or 43.70 RCW, or RCW 43.70.120 shall be construed to abridge the right of any person to rely exclusively on spiritual means alone through prayer to alleviate human ailments, sickness or disease, in accordance with the tenets and practice of the Church of Christ, Scientist, nor shall anything in chapters 43.20, 43.70 RCW, or RCW 43.70.120 be deemed to prohibit a person so relying who is inflicted with a contagious or communicable disease from being isolated or quarantined in a private place of his or her own choice, provided, it is approved by the local health officer, and all laws, rules and regulations governing control, sanitation, isolation and quarantine are complied with.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5145; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 260; 1979 c 141 s 59; 1967 ex.s. c 102 s 14. Formerly RCW 43.20A.665 and 43.20.210.]

NOTES:

Severability—1967 ex.s. c 102: See note following RCW 43.70.130.

Prayer: RCW 18.50.030, 70.127.040, 70.128.170, 74.09.190.